Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.065

Report of affairs of estate—Petition by beneficiary—Filing—Notice—Hearing—Other accounting and information.

A beneficiary who has not acknowledged in writing that his, her, or its interest in an estate has been fully paid or distributed may petition the court for an order directing the personal representative to deliver a report of the affairs of the estate signed and verified by the personal representative. The petition may be filed at any time after one year from the day on which the report was last delivered, or, if none, then one year after the order appointing the personal representative. Upon hearing of the petition after due notice as required in RCW 11.96A.110, the court may, for good cause shown, order the personal representative to deliver to the petitioner the report for any period not covered by a previous report. The report for the period shall include such of the following as the court may order: A description of the amount and nature of all property, real and personal, that has come into the hands of the personal representative; a statement of all property collected and paid out or distributed by the personal representative; a statement of claims filed and allowed against the estate and those rejected; any estate, inheritance, or fiduciary income tax returns filed by the personal representative; and such other information as the order may require. This subsection does not limit any power the court might otherwise have at any time during the administration of the estate to require the personal representative to account or furnish other information to any person interested in the estate.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4008; 1999 c 42 s 614; 1997 c 252 s 64.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.